zh-CN: 船舶转向电缆系统类型: 舷内转向; 喷射艇转向; 舷外转向; 齿条转向; 旋转转向; 其他
ja: 水上バイク用ステアリングケーブルシステムタイプ: インボードステアリング; ジェットボートステアリング; アウトボードステアリング; ラックステアリング; ロータリーステアリング; その他
bg-BG: Тип система на кормилното жило за плавателен съд: Управление за стационарен двигател; Управление за водометна лодка; Управление за извънбордов двигател; Рейково управление; Роторно управление; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava sajli za upravljanje plovilom: Upravljanje unutarnjim motorom; Upravljanje jet-boatom; Upravljanje vanjskim motorom; Upravljanje zupčastom letvom; Rotacijsko upravljanje; Ostalo
da: Systemtype for styrekabel til fartøj: Indenbordsstyring; Jetbådsstyring; Udenbordsstyring; Tandstangsstyring; Rotationsstyring; Andet
ko: 선박 조향 케이블 체계 유형: 인보드 스티어링; 제트 보트 스티어링; 아웃보드 스티어링; 랙 스티어링; 로터리 스티어링; 기타
cs: Typ systému lanového řízení plavidla: Řízení se zabudovaným motorem; Řízení tryskového člunu; Řízení se závěsným motorem; Hřebenové řízení; Rotační řízení; Jiné
it: Tipo di sistema di cavi di sterzo del natante: Timoneria entrobordo; Timoneria idrogetto; Timoneria fuoribordo; Timoneria a cremagliera; Timoneria rotativa; Altro
pt-BR: Cabo de direção de embarcação tipo de sistema: Direção de motor de centro; Direção de barco a jato; Direção de motor de popa; Direção por cremalheira; Direção rotativa; Outros
vi: Hệ thống cáp lái tàu thủy: Hệ thống lái trong tàu; Hệ thống lái tàu phản lực; Hệ thống lái ngoài tàu; Hệ thống lái thanh răng; Hệ thống lái quay; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului de cabluri de direcție pentru ambarcațiuni: Direcție inboard; Direcție pentru ambarcațiune cu jet; Direcție outboard; Direcție cu cremalieră; Direcție rotativă; Altele
es: Tipo de sistema de cable de dirección de la embarcación: Dirección intraborda; Dirección de lancha a reacción; Dirección fueraborda; Dirección de cremallera; Dirección rotativa; Otro
fr: Type de système de direction par câble d’embarcation: Direction in-board; Direction de jet boat; Direction hors-bord; Direction à crémaillère; Direction rotative; Autre
pl: Typ systemu linki sterowej jednostki pływającej: Układ kierowniczy do silników stacjonarnych; Układ kierowniczy do pędników strugowodnych; Układ kierowniczy do silników zaburtowych; Zębatkowy układ kierowniczy; Przekładnia kierownicza rotacyjna; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema krmilnega kabla za plovilo: Notranji krmilni sistem; Krmiljenje reaktivnega čolna; Izvenkrmni krmilni sistem; Krmiljenje z zobato letvijo; Rotacijsko krmiljenje; Drugo
sv: Typ av styrvajersystem för vattenskoter: Inombordsstyrning; Jetbåtsstyrning; Utombordsstyrning; Kuggstångsstyrning; Roterande styrning; Övrigt
th: ระบบสายเคเบิลบังคับเลี้ยวเรือ: ระบบบังคับเลี้ยวเครื่องยนต์ในเรือ; ระบบบังคับเลี้ยวเรือเจ็ต; ระบบบังคับเลี้ยวเครื่องยนต์ติดท้ายเรือ; ระบบบังคับเลี้ยวแบบแร็ค; ระบบบังคับเลี้ยวแบบโรตารี; อื่นๆ
hu: Vízi jármű kormánykábeles rendszerének típusa: Belső motoros kormánymű; Jet-hajó kormánymű; Külmotoros kormánymű; Fogasléces kormánymű; Forgódobos kormánymű; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ systému riadiaceho lanka plavidla: Riadenie pre zabudovaný motor; Riadenie pre vodný skúter/prúdový čln; Riadenie pre závesný motor; Hrebeňové riadenie; Rotačné riadenie; Iné
de: Art des Wasserfahrzeug-Lenkkabelsystems: Innenborder-Steuerung; Jetboot-Steuerung; Außenborder-Steuerung; Zahnstangenlenkung; Drehknopf-Lenkung; Sonstige
zh-TW: 船艇轉向纜線系統類型: 船內轉向; 噴射船轉向; 船外轉向; 齒條式轉向; 旋轉式轉向; 其他
el: Τύπος συστήματος καλωδίου τιμονιού σκάφους: Σύστημα διεύθυνσης έσωλέμβιας; Σύστημα διεύθυνσης jet boat; Σύστημα διεύθυνσης εξωλέμβιας; Σύστημα διεύθυνσης κρεμαγιέρας; Περιστροφικό σύστημα διεύθυνσης; Άλλο
fi: Vesikulkuneuvon ohjausvaijerijärjestelmän tyyppi: Sisämoottorin ohjaus; Vesisuihkuveneen ohjaus; Perämoottorin ohjaus; Hammastanko-ohjaus; Rumpuohjaus; Muu
ru: Тип системы рулевого троса водного транспорта: Рулевое управление для стационарного мотора; Рулевое управление для водометного катера; Рулевое управление для подвесного мотора; Реечное рулевое управление; Роторное рулевое управление; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema do cabo de direção da embarcação: Direção interior; Direção de barco a jato; Direção exterior; Direção de cremalheira; Direção rotativa; Outro
nb: Type styrekabelsystem for båt: Innenbordsstyring; Jetbåtstyring; Utenbordsstyring; Tannstangstyring; Roterende styring; Annet
en: Watercraft steering cable system type: Inboard steering; Jet boat steering; Outboard steering; Rack steering; Rotary steering; Other
tr: Deniz aracı direksiyon kablosu sistem tipi: İçten takmalı motor direksiyonu; Jet tekne direksiyonu; Dıştan takmalı motor direksiyonu; Kremayerli direksiyon; Döner direksiyon; Diğer
lt-LT: Vandens transporto priemonės vairo troso sistemos tipas: Stacionariojo variklio vairavimas; Reaktyvinio katerio vairavimas; Pakabinamojo variklio vairavimas; Krumpliastiebinis vairavimas; Rotacinis vairavimas; Kita
nl: Watervaartuig stuurkabel systeemtype: Binnenboordbesturing; Jetbootbesturing; Buitenboordbesturing; Tandheugelbesturing; Roterende besturing; Overige